Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 2. Applicability of Criminal Statutes.

Sec. 11.81.200.
Effect of amendment or repeal of criminal statutes.

When all or part of a criminal statute is amended or repealed, the criminal statute or part of it so amended or repealed remains in force for the purpose of authorizing the accusation, prosecution, conviction, and punishment of a person who violated the statute or part of it before the effective date of the amending or repealing Act, unless otherwise specified in the amending or repealing Act.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: V, 6-7.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The DMV can take action against a person’s driver’s license after the repeal date of AS 28.22 (mandatory insurance) if the person owned or operated a motor vehicle without the required insurance before the repeal date.
June 28, 1988, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 11.81.210.
Limitation on applicability.

This title does not bar, suspend, or otherwise affect any right to or liability for damages, penalty, forfeiture, or other remedy authorized by law to be recovered or enforced in a civil action, regardless of whether the conduct involved in the proceeding constitutes an offense defined in this title.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “law,” “conduct,” “offense” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Original Code Provision — AS 11.75.110.

TD: V, 7.

See AS

11.71.300

, for availability of civil or administrative penalty or sanction in addition to criminal penalties for violation of offenses under AS 11.71

Sec. 11.81.220.
All offenses defined by statute.

No conduct constitutes an offense unless it is made an offense

by this title;

by a statute outside this title; or

by a regulation authorized by and lawfully adopted under a statute.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “conduct,” “offense” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: V, 7-8.